Illinois, session 104th, HB5814.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 5Sections 25-10, 25-25, 25-90, and 25-100 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-10)7    Sec. 25-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Adjusted gross sports wagering receipts" means a master 9sports wagering licensee's gross sports wagering receipts, 10less winnings paid to wagerers in such games.11    "Athlete" means any current or former professional athlete 12or collegiate athlete.13    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.14    "Covered persons" includes athletes; umpires, referees, 15and officials; personnel associated with clubs, teams, 16leagues, and athletic associations; medical professionals 17(including athletic trainers) who provide services to athletes 18and players; and the family members and associates of these 19persons where required to serve the purposes of this Act.20    "Exchange wager" includes an agreement, contract, 21transaction, or swap that is offered, traded, or executed on a 22prediction market or exchange tied to a sporting contest or 23sporting event.   HB5814- 2 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    "Department" means the Department of the Lottery.2    "Gaming facility" means a facility at which gambling 3operations are conducted under the Illinois Gambling Act, 4pari-mutuel wagering is conducted under the Illinois Horse 5Racing Act of 1975, or sports wagering is conducted under this 6Act.7    "Official league data" means statistics, results, 8outcomes, and other data related to a sports event obtained 9pursuant to an agreement with the relevant sports governing 10body, or an entity expressly authorized by the sports 11governing body to provide such information to licensees, that 12authorizes the use of such data for determining the outcome of 13tier 2 sports wagers on such sports events.14    "Organization licensee" has the meaning given to that term 15in the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.16    "Owners licensee" means the holder of an owners license 17under the Illinois Gambling Act.18    "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, 19association, corporation, or any other organization or group 20of persons.21    "Personal biometric data" means an athlete's information 22derived from DNA, heart rate, blood pressure, perspiration 23rate, internal or external body temperature, hormone levels, 24glucose levels, hydration levels, vitamin levels, bone 25density, muscle density, and sleep patterns.26    "Prohibited conduct" includes any statement, action, and   HB5814- 3 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1other communication intended to influence, manipulate, or 2control a betting outcome of a sporting contest or of any 3individual occurrence or performance in a sporting contest in 4exchange for financial gain or to avoid financial or physical 5harm. "Prohibited conduct" includes statements, actions, and 6communications made to a covered person by a third party, such 7as a family member or through social media. "Prohibited 8conduct" does not include statements, actions, or 9communications made or sanctioned by a team or sports 10governing body.11    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant for a license 12under this Act whose application meets the mandatory minimum 13qualification criteria as required by the Board.14    "Sporting contest" means a sports event or game on which 15the State allows sports wagering to occur under this Act. 16    "Sports event" means a professional sport or athletic 17event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, a motor race 18event, or any other event or competition of relative skill 19authorized by the Board under this Act.20    "Sports facility" means a facility that hosts sports 21events and holds a seating capacity greater than 17,000 22persons, except in a municipality with a population of more 23than 1,000,000, a seating capacity greater than 10,000 24persons.25    "Sports governing body" means the organization that 26prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with   HB5814- 4 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1respect to a sports event and participants therein. 2    "Sports wagering" means accepting wagers on sports events 3or portions of sports events, or on the individual performance 4statistics of athletes in a sports event or combination of 5sports events, by any system or method of wagering, including, 6but not limited to, in person or over the Internet through 7websites and on mobile devices. "Sports wagering" includes, 8but is not limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, 9over-under, moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in-game 10wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets. 11"Sports wagering" does not include fantasy contests as that 12term is defined in Section 25-120.1.13    "Sports wagering account" means a financial record 14established by a master sports wagering licensee for an 15individual patron in which the patron may deposit and withdraw 16funds for sports wagering and other authorized purchases and 17to which the master sports wagering licensee may credit 18winnings or other amounts due to that patron or authorized by 19that patron.20    "Tier 1 sports wager" means a sports wager that is 21determined solely by the final score or final outcome of the 22sports event and is placed before the sports event has begun. 23    "Tier 2 sports wager" means a sports wager that is not a 24tier 1 sports wager.25    "Wager" means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an 26uncertain occurrence.  HB5814- 5 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1(Source: P.A. 104-468, Article 130, Section 130-5, eff. 26-16-26; 104-468, Article 140, Section 140-10, eff. 6-16-26; 3revised 7-13-26.) 4    (230 ILCS 45/25-25)5    Sec. 25-25. Sports wagering authorized.6    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 7the operation of sports wagering is only lawful when conducted 8in accordance with the provisions of this Act and the rules of 9the Illinois Gaming Board and the Department of the Lottery.10    (b) A person placing a wager under this Act shall be at 11least 21 years of age.12    (c) A licensee under this Act may not accept a wager on a 13minor league sports event.14    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a 15licensee under this Act may not accept a wager for a sports 16event involving an Illinois collegiate team.17    (d-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 18Act of the 102nd General Assembly until July 1, 2024, a 19licensee under this Act may accept a wager for a sports event 20involving an Illinois collegiate team if:21        (1) the wager is a tier 1 wager;22        (2) the wager is not related to an individual 23    athlete's performance; and24        (3) the wager is made in person instead of over the 25    Internet or through a mobile application.   HB5814- 6 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    (e) A licensee under this Act may only accept a wager from 2a person physically located in the State.3    (f) Master sports wagering licensees may use any data 4source for determining the results of all tier 1 sports 5wagers.6    (g) A sports governing body headquartered in the United 7States may notify the Board that it desires to supply official 8league data to master sports wagering licensees for 9determining the results of tier 2 sports wagers. Such 10notification shall be made in the form and manner as the Board 11may require. If a sports governing body does not notify the 12Board of its desire to supply official league data, a master 13sports wagering licensee may use any data source for 14determining the results of any and all tier 2 sports wagers on 15sports contests for that sports governing body.16    Within 30 days of a sports governing body notifying the 17Board, master sports wagering licensees shall use only 18official league data to determine the results of tier 2 sports 19wagers on sports events sanctioned by that sports governing 20body, unless: (1) the sports governing body or designee cannot 21provide a feed of official league data to determine the 22results of a particular type of tier 2 sports wager, in which 23case master sports wagering licensees may use any data source 24for determining the results of the applicable tier 2 sports 25wager until such time as such data feed becomes available on 26commercially reasonable terms; or (2) a master sports wagering   HB5814- 7 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1licensee can demonstrate to the Board that the sports 2governing body or its designee cannot provide a feed of 3official league data to the master sports wagering licensee on 4commercially reasonable terms. During the pendency of the 5Board's determination, such master sports wagering licensee 6may use any data source for determining the results of any and 7all tier 2 sports wagers. 8    (h) A licensee under this Act may not accept wagers on a 9kindergarten through 12th grade sports event.10    (i) (Blank). A licensee may offer pool sports wagering to 11State patrons where State patrons compete against patrons 12located outside of the State. In such cases, the pool must be 13expressly permitted in all jurisdictions in which it is 14offered and must comply with all laws, rules, and regulations 15in all jurisdictions in which it is offered. The adjusted 16gross sports wagering receipts of an interstate pool shall be 17determined by the total value of all wagers placed in the State 18less the proportional pro rata value of all winnings paid to 19patrons. The pro rata value of all winnings shall be 20determined by the ratio of the total value of all wagers placed 21in the State divided by the total value of all wagers placed in 22the pool, to the nearest .01%. 23(Source: P.A. 103-4, eff. 5-31-23; 104-468, eff. 6-16-26.) 24    (230 ILCS 45/25-90)25    Sec. 25-90. Tax; Sports Wagering Fund.   HB5814- 8 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    (a) For the privilege of holding a license to operate 2sports wagering under this Act until June 30, 2024, this State 3shall impose and collect 15% of a master sports wagering 4licensee's adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from sports 5wagering. The accrual method of accounting shall be used for 6purposes of calculating the amount of the tax owed by the 7licensee.8    The taxes levied and collected pursuant to this subsection 9(a) are due and payable to the Board no later than the last day 10of the month following the calendar month in which the 11adjusted gross sports wagering receipts were received and the 12tax obligation was accrued.13    (a-5) In addition to the tax imposed under subsection (a), 14(d), (d-5), or (d-7) of this Section, for the privilege of 15holding a license to operate sports wagering under this Act, 16the State shall impose and collect 2% of the adjusted gross 17receipts from sports wagers that are placed within a home rule 18county with a population of over 3,000,000 inhabitants, which 19shall be paid, subject to appropriation from the General 20Assembly, from the Sports Wagering Fund to that home rule 21county for the purpose of enhancing the county's criminal 22justice system.23    (b) The Sports Wagering Fund is hereby created as a 24special fund in the State treasury. Except as otherwise 25provided in this Act, all moneys collected under this Act by 26the Board shall be deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund.   HB5814- 9 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1Through August 25, 2024, on the 25th of each month, any moneys 2remaining in the Sports Wagering Fund in excess of the 3anticipated monthly expenditures from the Fund through the 4next month, as certified by the Board to the State 5Comptroller, shall be transferred by the State Comptroller and 6the State Treasurer to the Capital Projects Fund. Beginning 7September 25, 2024, on the 25th of each month, of the moneys 8remaining in the Sports Wagering Fund in excess of the 9anticipated monthly expenditures from the Fund through the 10next month, as certified by the Board to the State 11Comptroller, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 12Treasurer shall transfer 58% to the General Revenue Fund and 1342% to the Capital Projects Fund. 14    (c) Beginning with July 2021, and on a monthly basis 15thereafter, the Board shall certify to the State Comptroller 16the amount of license fees collected in the month for initial 17licenses issued under this Act, except for occupational 18licenses. As soon after certification as practicable, the 19State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 20transfer the certified amount from the Sports Wagering Fund to 21the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 22    (d) Beginning on July 1, 2024, and for each 12-month 23period thereafter, for the privilege of holding a license to 24operate sports wagering under this Act, this State shall 25impose a privilege tax on the master sports licensee's 26adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from sports wagering   HB5814- 10 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1over the Internet or through a mobile application based on the 2following rates: 3        20% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 4    up to and including $30,000,000.5        25% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 6    in excess of $30,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000.7        30% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 8    in excess of $50,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000.9        35% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 10    in excess of $100,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000.11        40% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 12    in excess of $200,000,000. 13    (d-5) Beginning on July 1, 2024, and for each 12-month 14period thereafter, for the privilege of holding a license to 15operate sports wagering under this Act, this State shall 16impose a privilege tax on the master sports licensee's 17adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from sports wagering 18from other than over the Internet or through a mobile 19application based on the following rates: 20        20% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 21    up to and including $30,000,000.22        25% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 23    in excess of $30,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000.24        30% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 25    in excess of $50,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000.26        35% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts   HB5814- 11 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    in excess of $100,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000.2        40% of annual adjusted gross sports wagering receipts 3    in excess of $200,000,000.4    (d-7) Beginning on July 1, 2025, and each month 5thereafter, for the privilege of holding a license to operate 6sports wagering under this Act, this State shall impose a 7wager tax on each master sports licensee for each individual 8wager placed with the master sports licensee for sports 9wagering over the Internet or through a mobile application. 10The tax shall be based on the following schedule and shall be 11in addition to any other taxes or fees imposed under this Act:12    The tax shall be $0.25 per wager for the first 20,000,000 13annual combined Tier 1 and Tier 2 wagers.14    The tax shall be $0.50 per wager for each wager in excess 15of 20,000,000 annual combined Tier 1 and Tier 2 wagers.16    The tax levied under this subsection shall be deposited 17monthly into the Sports Wagering Fund. The Board shall certify 18all amounts deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund under this 19subsection to the State Comptroller. The State Comptroller 20shall direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer that 21certified amount from the Sports Wagering Fund to the General 22Revenue Fund.23    As used in this subsection, "annual combined Tier 1 and 24Tier 2 wagers" means the total number of individual wagers 25placed with the licensee, regardless of outcome or payout in a 26given fiscal year.   HB5814- 12 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    (d-10) The accrual method of accounting shall be used for 2purposes of calculating the amount of the tax owed by the 3licensee.4    (d-15) The taxes levied and collected pursuant to 5subsections (d) (d-5), and (d-7) are due and payable to the 6Board no later than the last day of the month following the 7calendar month in which the adjusted gross sports wagering 8receipts were received and the tax obligation was accrued. 9    (d-20) (Blank). In addition to all other taxes and 10payments owed under this Act, any wagers offered under this 11Act shall be subject to incur a transaction tax equal to the 121.75% of each exchange wager. After the first five million 13exchange wagers conducted by a licensee during a fiscal year, 14the transaction tax imposed under this subsection shall 15increase to 3.5% of each exchange wager.16    The tax levied under this subsection shall be deposited 17monthly into the Sports Wagering Fund. The Board shall certify 18all amounts deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund under this 19subsection to the State Comptroller. The State Comptroller 20shall direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer that 21certified amount from the Sports Wagering Fund to the General 22Revenue Fund. 23    (e) Annually, a master sports wagering licensee shall 24transmit to the Board an audit of the financial transactions 25and condition of the licensee's total operations. 26Additionally, within 90 days after the end of each quarter of   HB5814- 13 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1each fiscal year, the master sports wagering licensee shall 2transmit to the Board a compliance report on engagement 3procedures determined by the Board. All audits and compliance 4engagements shall be conducted by certified public accountants 5selected by the Board. Each certified public accountant must 6be registered in the State of Illinois under the Illinois 7Public Accounting Act. The compensation for each certified 8public accountant shall be paid directly by the master sports 9wagering licensee to the certified public accountant. 10(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25; 11104-468, eff. 6-16-26.) 12    (230 ILCS 45/25-100)13    Sec. 25-100. Voluntary self-exclusion program for sports 14wagering and fantasy contests. Any resident, or non-resident 15if allowed to participate in sports wagering or fantasy 16contests, may voluntarily prohibit himself or herself from 17establishing a sports wagering account or fantasy contest 18account with a licensee under this Act. The Board and 19Department shall incorporate the voluntary self-exclusion 20program for sports wagering and fantasy contests into any 21existing self-exclusion program that it operates on the 22effective date of this Act.23(Source: P.A. 104-468, eff. 6-16-26.) 24    (230 ILCS 45/25-120 rep.)  HB5814- 14 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.1 rep.)2    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.2 rep.)3    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.3 rep.)4    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.4 rep.)5    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.5 rep.)6    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.6 rep.)7    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.7 rep.)8    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.8 rep.)9    Section 10. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by 10repealing Sections 25-120, 25-120.1, 25-120.2, 25-120.3, 1125-120.4, 25-120.5, 25-120.6, 25-120.7, and 25-120.8. 12    Section 15. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 13changing Sections 28-1 and 28-8 as follows: 14    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)15    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 16    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:17        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 18    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 19    subsection (b) of this Section;20        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 21    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 22    election;23        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 24    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of,   HB5814- 15 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;2        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 3    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 4    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 5    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 6    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 7    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 8    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 9    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 10    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 11    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 12    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 13    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 14    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 15    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 16    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 17    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 18    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 19    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 20    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 21    of this paragraph (4);22        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument 23    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 24    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 25    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 26    wager;  HB5814- 16 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 2    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 3    appointment or election;4        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 5    sells, offers to sell or transfers any ticket or share for 6    any lottery;7        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 8    sells, offers to sell or knowingly possesses or transfers 9    any policy ticket, slip, record, document or other similar 10    device;11        (9) knowingly drafts, prints or publishes any lottery 12    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 13    document or similar device, except for such activity 14    related to lotteries, bingo games and raffles authorized 15    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 16    or any other state or foreign government;17        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 18    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo games 19    and raffles authorized by and conducted in accordance with 20    the laws of Illinois or any other state;21        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 22    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 23    telegraph, radio, semaphore or similar means; or knowingly 24    installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or 25    receipt of such information; except that nothing in this 26    subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or receipt of such   HB5814- 17 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    information for use in news reporting of sporting events 2    or contests; or3        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 4    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 5    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 6    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 7    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 8    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 9    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 10    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 11    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 12not be convicted of gambling:13        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 14    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 15    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 16    insurance.17        (2) Offers of prizes, award or compensation to the 18    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 19    determination of skill, speed, strength or endurance or to 20    the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such contest.21        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 22    this State.23        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 24    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 25    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 26    commerce to any place outside this State when such   HB5814- 18 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 2    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 3    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 4    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 5    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.6        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 7    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.8        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 9    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 10    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 11    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 12    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.13        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 14    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 15    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 16    Illinois Lottery Law. 17        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 18    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 19    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 20    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 21    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.22        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 23    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.24        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 25    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 26    Act.   HB5814- 19 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 2    the Charitable Games Act.3        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 4    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.5        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 6    Gambling Act.7        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 8    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 9    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 10    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 11    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 12        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 13    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 14    required to participate. 15        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 16    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 17    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 18    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 19    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 20    U.S.C. 1463). 21        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 22    the Sports Wagering Act. 23        (16) (Blank). Fantasy contests conducted in accordance 24    with Sections 25-120 through 25-120.8 of the Sports 25    Wagering Act. 26    (c) Sentence.  HB5814- 20 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent 2conviction under subsections (a)(3) through (a)(12), is a 3Class 4 felony.4    (d) Circumstantial evidence.5    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 6shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 7prosecution.8(Source: P.A. 104-468, eff. 6-16-26.) 9    (720 ILCS 5/28-8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-8)10    Sec. 28-8. Gambling losses recoverable. 11    (a) Any person who by gambling shall lose to any other 12person, any sum of money or thing of value, amounting to the 13sum of $50 or more and shall pay or deliver the same or any 14part thereof, may sue for and recover the money or other thing 15of value, so lost and paid or delivered, in a civil action 16against the winner thereof, with costs, in the circuit court. 17No person who accepts from another person for transmission, 18and transmits, either in his own name or in the name of such 19other person, any order for any transaction to be made upon, or 20who executes any order given to him by another person, or who 21executes any transaction for his own account on, any regular 22board of trade or commercial, commodity or stock exchange, 23shall, under any circumstances, be deemed a "winner" of any 24moneys lost by such other person in or through any such 25transactions.  HB5814- 21 -LRB104 22394 HLH 38837 b1    (b) If within 6 months, such person who under the terms of 2Subsection 28-8(a) is entitled to initiate action to recover 3his losses does not in fact pursue his remedy, any person may 4initiate a civil action against the winner. The court or the 5jury, as the case may be, shall determine the amount of the 6loss. After such determination, the court shall enter a 7judgment of triple the amount so determined.8    (c) Gambling losses as a result of gambling conducted on a 9video gaming terminal licensed under the Video Gaming Act are 10not recoverable under this Section.11    (d) (Blank). Losses as a result of participation in 12single-player fantasy contests against a fantasy contest 13operator prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 14the 104th General Assembly are not recoverable under this 15Section.16    (e) (Blank). Losses as a result of participation in 17fantasy contests conducted under Sections 25-120 through 1825-120.8 of the Sports Wagering Act are not recoverable under 19this Section. 20(Source: P.A. 104-468, eff. 6-16-26.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.